Massachusetts, session 194th, H3127.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3(B)(a)(9) of Chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2018 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the text and inserting in place thereof
the following:-
(9) In the case of an individual who pays rent for his principal place of residence and
such residence is located in the commonwealth, an amount equal to 50 per cent of such rent;
provided, however, that such deduction shall not exceed $4,100 for a single person, for a person
that qualifies as a head of household under section two (b) of the Code, or for spouses, increased
by an amount equal to the deduction limit multiplied by the cost-of-living adjustment for the
calendar year in which the taxable year begins; provided, that the household income of eligible
taxpayers shall not exceed 100 percent of the area median income, as defined by the United
of 2

States Department of Housing and Urban Development. For the purposes of this section, the term
“cost-of-living adjustment” means, for any calendar year, the percentage, if any, by which the
consumer price index for the preceding calendar year exceeds the consumer price index, as
defined in section 1 of the Code, for calendar year 2021. The commissioner shall adopt
regulations necessary for the implementation of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022.
of 2